Washington statutes.
RCW 18.120.020

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Applicant group" includes any health professional group or organization, any individual, or any other interested party which proposes that any health professional group not presently regulated be regulated or which proposes to substantially increase the scope of practice of the profession.

(2) "Certificate" and "certification" mean a voluntary process by which a statutory regulatory entity grants recognition to an individual who (a) has met certain prerequisite qualifications specified by that regulatory entity, and (b) may assume or use "certified" in the title or designation to perform prescribed health professional tasks.

(3) "Grandfather clause" means a provision in a regulatory statute applicable to practitioners actively engaged in the regulated health profession prior to the effective date of the regulatory statute which exempts the practitioners from meeting the prerequisite qualifications set forth in the regulatory statute to perform prescribed occupational tasks.

(4) "Health professions" means and includes the following health and health-related licensed or regulated professions and occupations: Podiatric medicine and surgery under chapter 18.22 RCW; chiropractic under chapter 18.25 RCW; dental hygiene under chapter 18.29 RCW; dentistry under chapter 18.32 RCW; denturism under chapter 18.30 RCW; dental anesthesia assistants under chapter 18.350 RCW; dispensing opticians under chapter 18.34 RCW; hearing instruments under chapter 18.35 RCW; naturopaths under chapter 18.36A RCW; embalming and funeral directing under chapter 18.39 RCW; midwifery under chapter 18.50 RCW; nursing home administration under chapter 18.52 RCW; optometry under chapters 18.53 and 18.54 RCW; ocularists under chapter 18.55 RCW; osteopathic medicine and surgery under chapter 18.57 RCW; pharmacy under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW; medicine under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW; emergency medicine under chapter 18.73 RCW; physical therapy under chapter 18.74 RCW; practical nurses under chapter 18.79 RCW; psychologists under chapter 18.83 RCW; registered nurses under chapter 18.79 RCW; occupational therapists licensed under chapter 18.59 RCW; respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW; veterinarians and veterinary technicians under chapter 18.92 RCW; massage therapists under chapter 18.108 RCW; acupuncturists or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioners licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW; persons registered under chapter 18.19 RCW; persons licensed as mental health counselors, marriage and family therapists, and social workers under chapter 18.225 RCW; dietitians and nutritionists certified by chapter 18.138 RCW; radiologic technicians under chapter 18.84 RCW; nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter 18.88A RCW; reflexologists certified under chapter 18.108 RCW; medical assistants-certified, medical assistants-hemodialysis technician, medical assistants-phlebotomist, forensic phlebotomist, medical assistant-EMT, and medical assistants-registered certified and registered under chapter 18.360 RCW; licensed behavior analysts, licensed assistant behavior analysts, and certified behavior technicians under chapter 18.380 RCW; music therapists licensed under chapter 18.233 RCW; dental therapists licensed under chapter 18.265 RCW; and anesthesiologist assistants licensed under chapter 18.71D RCW.

(5) "Inspection" means the periodic examination of practitioners by a state agency in order to ascertain whether the practitioners' occupation is being carried out in a fashion consistent with the public health, safety, and welfare.

(6) "Legislative committees of reference" means the standing legislative committees designated by the respective rules committees of the senate and house of representatives to consider proposed legislation to regulate health professions not previously regulated.

(7) "License," "licensing," and "licensure" mean permission to engage in a health profession which would otherwise be unlawful in the state in the absence of the permission. A license is granted to those individuals who meet prerequisite qualifications to perform prescribed health professional tasks and for the use of a particular title.

(8) "Practitioner" means an individual who (a) has achieved knowledge and skill by practice, and (b) is actively engaged in a specified health profession.

(9) "Professional license" means an individual, nontransferable authorization to carry on a health activity based on qualifications which include: (a) Graduation from an accredited or approved program, and (b) acceptable performance on a qualifying examination or series of examinations.

(10) "Public member" means an individual who is not, and never was, a member of the health profession being regulated or the spouse of a member, or an individual who does not have and never has had a material financial interest in either the rendering of the health professional service being regulated or an activity directly related to the profession being regulated.

(11) "Registration" means the formal notification which, prior to rendering services, a practitioner shall submit to a state agency setting forth the name and address of the practitioner; the location, nature and operation of the health activity to be practiced; and, if required by the regulatory entity, a description of the service to be provided.

(12) "Regulatory entity" means any board, commission, agency, division, or other unit or subunit of state government which regulates one or more professions, occupations, industries, businesses, or other endeavors in this state.

(13) "State agency" includes every state office, department, board, commission, regulatory entity, and agency of the state, and, where provided by law, programs and activities involving less than the full responsibility of a state agency.

[ 2024 c 362 s 9; 2024 c 217 s 6. Prior: 2023 c 460 s 14; 2023 c 175 s 9; 2020 c 80 s 22; 2019 c 308 s 17; 2017 c 336 s 19; prior: 2016 c 41 s 17; 2015 c 118 s 12; prior: 2012 c 153 s 15; 2012 c 153 s 14; 2012 c 137 s 18; 2012 c 23 s 8; 2010 c 286 s 14; 2001 c 251 s 26; 2000 c 93 s 15; 1997 c 334 s 13; 1996 c 178 s 9; prior: 1995 c 323 s 15; 1995 c 1 s 18 (Initiative Measure No. 607, approved November 8, 1994); 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 718; 1989 c 300 s 14; prior: 1988 c 277 s 12; 1988 c 267 s 21; prior: 1987 c 512 s 21; 1987 c 447 s 17; 1987 c 415 s 16; 1987 c 412 s 14; prior: 1985 c 326 s 28; 1985 c 117 s 3; prior: 1984 c 279 s 57; 1984 c 9 s 18; 1983 c 168 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2024 c 217 s 6 and by 2024 c 362 s 9, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2023 c 460 ss 1-22: See note following RCW 18.265.005.

Effective date—2020 c 80 ss 12-59: See note following RCW 7.68.030.

Intent—2020 c 80: See note following RCW 18.71A.010.

Findings—2019 c 308: See note following RCW 18.06.010.

Effective date—2017 c 336 ss 18 and 19: See note following RCW 18.130.040.

Finding—2017 c 336: See note following RCW 9.96.060.

Effective date—2016 c 41: See note following RCW 18.108.010.

Effective date—2015 c 118: See note following RCW 18.380.010.

Effective date—2012 c 153 ss 15 and 17: "Sections 15 and 17 of this act take effect July 1, 2016." [ 2012 c 153 s 23.]

Rules—2012 c 153: See note following RCW 18.360.005.

Finding—Purpose—Rules—Effective date—2012 c 137: See notes following RCW 18.108.005.

Intent—2010 c 286: See RCW 18.06.005.

Severability—2001 c 251: See RCW 18.225.900.

Effective dates—1997 c 334: See note following RCW 18.89.010.

Effective date—1996 c 178: See note following RCW 18.35.110.

Short title—1995 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 607): See RCW 18.30.900.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.

Effective date—1987 c 412: See RCW 18.84.901.

Severability—1984 c 279: See RCW 18.130.901.